Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5569.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1a. This act does not apply to business transacted pursuant to a license under the earned wage access services act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5558 (request no. H04676'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.